en: Neohesperidin DC, NHDC, Neohesperidin dihydrochalcone
es: Neohesperidina dihidrocalcona, Neohesperidina DC
fr: Néohespéridine dihydrochalcone, NHDC
hr: Neohesperidin dc
la: E-959

en: Neotame
es: Neotame
fr: Néotame
hr: Neotame
ja: ネオテーム
la: E-961

en: Saccharin, Saccharin sweetener
bg: Захарин
es: Sacarina
fr: Saccharine, Saccarine, Édulcorant à la saccharine
hr: Saharin
ja: サッカリン
la: E-954
nl: Saccharine

en: Sodium cyclamate
es: Ciclamato, Ciclamato de sodio
fr: Cyclamate, Cyclamate de sodium
hr: Natrijev ciklamat
ja: チクロ
la: E-952
nl: Natriumcyclamaat
pl: Cyklaminian sodu

en: Sucralose
bg: Сукралоза
es: Sucralosa
fi: Sukraloosi
fr: Sucralose
hr: Sukraloza
ja: スクラロース
la: E-955
nl: Sucralose
pl: Sukraloza

en: Erythritol
xx: Erythritol
bg: Еритритол
ja: エリスリトール
pl: Erytrytol

en: Isomalt
bg: Изомалт
fr: Isomalt

en: Natural sugar substitutes, Natural sweeteners
de: Natürliche Süßungsmittel, Natürliche Süßstoffe
es: Edulcorantes naturales
fi: luonnollisia sokerin korvikkeita
fr: Édulcorants naturels
hr: Prirodne zamjene za šećer
it: Dolcificanti naturali, Sostituti naturali dello zucchero
nl: Natuurlijke zoetstoffen
pl: Naturalne zastępniki cukru, Naturalne substytuty cukru
ru: Натуральные заменители сахара, Натуральные подсластители

en: Fructose
bg: Фруктоза
es: Fructosa
fr: Fructose
hr: Fruktoza
it: Fruttosio
ja: フルクトース
nl: Fructose, Vruchtensuiker
pl: Fruktoza
ru: Фруктоза

en: Glucose
bg: Глюкоза
es: Glucosa
fr: Glucose
hr: Glukoza
ja: グルコース
nl: Glucose
pl: Glukoza

en: Lactitol
es: Lactitol
fr: Lactitol
hr: Laktitol
hu: Laktit, E-966
ja: ラクチトール
la: E-966
nl: Lactitol

en: Maltitol
xx: Maltitol
hu: E 965, Maltit
ja: マルチトール
la: E-965I

en: Sorbitol
xx: Sorbitol
bg: Сорбитол
ja: ソルビトール
la: E-420

en: Steviol glycosides
bg: Стевиол гликозиди
es: Glucósidos de esteviol
fr: Steviol glycosides
hr: Steviol glikozidi
ja: ステビオール配糖体
nl: Steviol glycosiden
pl: Glikozydy stewiolowe

en: Xylitol
bg: Ксилитол
de: Xylit, Xylitol
es: Xilitol
fi: Ksylitoli
fr: Xylitol
hr: Ksilitol
ja: キシリトール
la: E-967
nl: Xylitol
pl: Ksylitol, Cukier brzozowy

en: Tabletop sweeteners
de: Tafelsüßen
es: Edulcorantes de mesa
fi: Pöytämakeuttajat
fr: Édulcorants de table, Édulcorant de table
hr: Stolni zaslađivači
it: Dolcificanti da tavola
nl: Tafelzoetstoffen

en: Syrups
bg: Сироп
ca: Almívars, xarops
cs: Sirupy
da: Sirupper, Sirup
de: Sirups, Sirup
es: Siropes, Jarabes
fi: siirapit
fr: Sirops, sirop
he: סירופ
hr: sirup
hu: Szirupok
it: Sciroppi, Sciroppo
ja: シロップ
nl: Siropen
pl: Syrop, syropy
pt: Xaropes
ro: Sirop
ru: Сиропы
sv: Siraper, Sirap
th: น้ำเชื่อม
zh: 糖浆

en: Thick syrups
de: Lütticher Sirups
es: Sirope de Lieja
fr: Sirops de Liège
nl: Stropen, Luikse siroop
ru: Льежский сироп

en: Thick sugar syrups, Thick sugar syrup
nl: Suikerstropen, Suikerstroop

en: Thick fruit syrups
nl: Fruitstropen